District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1202.02

Board of Trustees Nominating Committee.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1425, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 202
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2916
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-161, § 2, 32 DCR 158
Feb. 27, 1990, D.C. Law 8-69, § 3, 36 DCR 7737
April 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(i), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1512.
1973 Ed., § 31-1712.